Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 77.04.030 and 2001 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The fish and wildlife commission consists of ((nine))13 members and four alternate members.(a) Nine members must be registered voters of the state. In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall appoint with the advice and consent of the senate three registered voters to the commission to serve for terms of six years from that January or until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the commission prior to the expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a registered voter within ((sixty))60 days to complete the term. Three members shall be residents of that portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and three shall be residents of that portion of the state lying west of the summit of the Cascade mountains. Three additional members shall be appointed at large. No two members may be residents of the same county. Persons eligible for appointment as members of the commission under this subsection (1)(a) shall have general knowledge of the habits and distribution of fish and wildlife and shall not hold another state, county, or municipal elective or appointive office.(b)(i) Four additional members must be elected chairs, or elected to an equivalent executive office, of a federally recognized Indian tribe whose traditional lands and territories include parts of Washington. Two members must be from tribes located east of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and two members must be from tribes located west of the summit of the Cascade mountains. In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, two elected tribal chairs to the commission to serve for terms of four years from that January or until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs prior to the expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a qualified tribal chair within 60 days to complete the term, and an alternate member appointed pursuant to (b)(ii) of this subsection shall serve as commissioner until a new qualified chair is appointed. If a member appointed under this subsection (1)(b)(i) no longer serves as an elected chair or equivalent executive office for any reason, the seat is considered vacant.(ii) Four alternate members must be elected to a tribal council, or an equivalent legislative body, of a federally recognized Indian tribe whose traditional lands and territories include parts of Washington to serve in the absence of a member appointed under (b)(i) of this subsection. Two alternate members must be from tribes located east of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and two alternate members must be from tribes located west of the summit of the Cascade mountains. In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, alternate members for terms of four years from that January or until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs prior to the expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a qualified elected tribal councilmember within 60 days to complete the term. If an alternate appointed under this subsection (1)(b)(ii) no longer serves on a tribal council or equivalent tribal legislative office for any reason, the position shall be considered vacant.(iii) When acting in the role of commissioner, members appointed under this subsection (1)(b) shall represent the interests of all federally recognized tribes whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington.(2) The legal office of the commission is at the administrative office of the department in Olympia.Sec. 2. RCW 77.04.040 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:((Persons eligible for appointment as members of the commission shall have general knowledge of the habits and distribution of fish and wildlife and shall not hold another state, county, or municipal elective or appointive office.)) In making ((these))all appointments to the commission, the governor shall seek to maintain a balance reflecting all aspects of fish and wildlife, including representation recommended by organized groups representing sportfishers, commercial fishers, hunters, private landowners, federally recognized tribes, and environmentalists. Persons eligible for appointment as fish and wildlife commissioners shall comply with the provisions of chapters 42.52 and ((42.17))42.56 RCW.Sec. 3. RCW 77.04.060 and 2013 c 23 s 238 are each amended to read as follows:The commission shall hold at least one regular meeting during the first two months of each calendar quarter, and special meetings when called by the chair and by ((five))seven members. ((Five))Seven members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.The commission at a meeting in each odd-numbered year shall elect one of its members as chair and another member as vice chair, each of whom shall serve for a term of two years or until a successor is elected and qualified.Members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. In addition, members are allowed their travel expenses incurred while absent from their usual places of residence in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.--- END ---